New Mexico, session 2026, SB225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Thirty-three million dollars ($33,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the local government division of the department of finance and administration for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for tribal liaison programs in county clerk offices that choose to participate in the program to aid the county's Native American population and ensure equal access to all phases of the electoral process by providing voter education and awareness, translation services and voter registration drives, all on a nonpartisan basis. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -